Wisconsin, session 2025, AB596.
do enact as follows:AB596,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB596,24Section 2. 20.485 (2) (vv) of the statutes is created to read:AB596,2,7520.485 (2) (vv) State matching grants. The amounts in the schedule to 6provide state matching grants to eligible entities other than the state that are 7recipients of federal per diem payments.AB596,2,88